District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-2201.33

Emergency speed-limit changes.

Repealed.

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-307, § 105, 60 DCR 2753
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 6002, 60 DCR 12472
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 6002 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 6002 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 6001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VI of the act may be cited as the “Safety-Based Traffic Enforcement Fine Reduction Amendment Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.